Vermont, session 2025-2026, H309.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5862g is added to read:
§ 5862g. VERMONT HOUSING AND CONSERVATION TRUST FUND
CHECKOFF
(a) Returns filed by individuals shall include, on a form prescribed by the
Commissioner of Taxes, an opportunity for the taxpayer to designate funds to
the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund established under
10 V.S.A. § 312.
VT LEG #379042 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.309
2025 Page 2 of 3
(b) Amounts designated under subsection (a) of this section shall be
deducted from refunds due to, or overpayment made by, the designating
taxpayer. All amounts so designated and deducted shall be deposited in an
account by the Commissioner of Taxes for payment to the Vermont Housing
and Conservation Trust Fund. If at any time after the payment of amounts so
designated to the account it is determined that the taxpayer was not entitled to
all or any part of the amount so designated, the Commissioner may assess, and
the account shall then pay to the Commissioner, the amount received, together
with interest at the rate prescribed by section 3108 of this title, from the date
the payment was made until the date of repayment.
(c) The Commissioner of Taxes shall explain to taxpayers the purpose of
the account and how to contribute to it.
(d) If amounts paid with respect to a return are insufficient to cover both
the amount owed on the return under this chapter and the amount designated as
a contribution to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund, the
payment shall first be applied to the amount owed on the return under this
chapter and the balance, if any, shall be deposited in the Fund.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Commissioner
to collect any amount designated as a contribution to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Trust Fund.
VT LEG #379042 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.309
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect on January 1,
2025 and apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379042 v.1